Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1521
Revenue bonds; pledge of revenue; payment; board; powers and duties; bonds not obligation of state.

Each board may, by resolution or agreement, pledge all or any part of the revenue and fees derived from the operation of the dormitories, residence halls, single-dwelling units, multiple-dwelling units, buildings, and other facilities for housing, boarding, medical care, and other activities of students, faculty, or employees of the institution under its control erected or acquired or previously erected or acquired by any such board and contract as to the care, insurance, management, and operation of such buildings and facilities and the charges to be made and the rights of the holders of the revenue bonds. When any board contracts that the operation of any building or facility or part thereof shall be performed other than by the board itself, such board shall at all times maintain supervision of and control over the fees and charges imposed for the use of such building, facility, or part. In issuing revenue bonds and pledging revenue therefor, the board may pledge all or any part of the revenue and fees from buildings and facilities other than the building or facility to be constructed. Bonds issued under sections 85-1520 to 85-1527 shall not be an obligation of the State of Nebraska, and no tax, except for the tax authorized under subdivision (1)(b) of section 85-1517 for fiscal years prior to fiscal year 2013-14 and subdivision (2)(b) of section 85-1517 for fiscal year 2013-14 and each fiscal year thereafter, shall ever be levied to raise funds for the payment thereof or interest thereon. The bonds shall constitute limited obligations of the board issuing the same and shall be paid out of revenue from the tax levy authorized pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of section 85-1517 for fiscal years prior to fiscal year 2013-14 and subdivision (2)(b) of section 85-1517 for fiscal year 2013-14 and each fiscal year thereafter and out of money derived from the revenue and earnings pledged as provided in sections 85-1501 to 85-1539.

Laws 1987, LB 329, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 35;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 79-2650.09;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 43;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 73;

Laws 2012, LB946, § 20;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 223.
July 1, 2026